Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 1 Commercial Property

32-6-130.
“Commercial driveway” defined.

As used in this part, the term “commercial driveway” means any private entrance, exit, ramp, tunnel, bridge, side road, or other vehicular passageway to any property used for commercial purposes, except a farm or a dwelling house not exceeding a four-family capacity, and leading to or from any public road on the state highway system.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-942, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-131.
Permit requirement as to construction or improvement of commercial driveways; authority of department to close driveways for violations.

It shall be unlawful for any person to construct a new commercial driveway or to reconstruct, alter, or improve any existing commercial driveway without first obtaining a permit from the department therefor and complying with the department regulations authorized by Code Section 32-6-133. A violation of this Code section, in addition to being unlawful, shall entitle the department to barricade, displace, or otherwise close such driveway and to collect the costs therefor from the violator as provided in Code Section 32-6-134.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-943, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 34.

32-6-132.
Change or substitution of existing commercial driveways.

Any commercial driveway constructed prior to July 1, 1973, and adjudged by the department to be unsafe for the traveling public or in violation of department regulations promulgated pursuant to Code Section 32-6-133 may be changed or caused to be changed by the department so as to eliminate any unsafe features; or it may be closed or displaced by substitution therefor of another driveway at such place or of such design as may be deemed safe. Liability for the expense of such change or substitution will be determined in accordance with Code Section 32-6-134.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-944, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-6-133.
Promulgation of regulations; charges for permits for commercial driveways.

The department is granted the authority to promulgate uniform and reasonable regulations to carry out the provisions of this part. In making such regulations the department shall specify among other things the circumstances under which commercial driveway permits may be issued or revoked, provided that such regulations shall not deprive the landowner of reasonable access to the public road on the state highway system.

Where a person seeks a permit to construct, reconstruct, alter, or improve a commercial driveway and the commercial driveway will lie in whole or in part upon a parcel of land acquired for the state highway system from such person or the immediately preceding owner of such property from whom such person acquired title to such property, the total amount of money charged to such person as a condition of obtaining the permit shall not exceed the compensation received by such person or the immediately preceding owner of such property from whom such person acquired title to such property for such parcel of land upon its acquisition for the state highway system. This limitation shall apply to the total of all amounts of money of whatever character charged to such person as a condition of obtaining the permit, including without limitation any and all amounts charged for title to or use of land and any and all fees or other costs of any nature whatsoever. This subsection shall constitute only a maximum limitation upon the total amount of money charged under such circumstances and shall not in any manner be construed to establish a minimum amount of money to be charged under such circumstances.

Except in the case of heirs and assigns, the limitation of the department to require a payment of more than the maximum amount received for such property as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall last for only a ten-year period from the date of the initial acquisition of property by the department.

This subsection shall apply with respect to land acquired for the state highway system prior to April 15, 1996, as well as land so acquired on or after April 15, 1996.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-946, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1010, § 4.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, in subsection (b), “ten-year” was substituted for “ten year” in paragraph (b)(2) and, in paragraph (b)(3), “April 15, 1996,” was substituted for “its effective date” and “April 15, 1996” was substituted for “the effective date of this subsection” at the end.

32-6-134.
Procedure by department upon discovery of violation of Code Section 32-6-131; liability for expenses incurred in connection with changes made in commercial driveways.

Upon discovery of a violation of Code Section 32-6-131, the department shall give written notice by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the offender to commence removing any offending condition within ten days of receipt of such notice. Upon failure to comply with such notice or to complete such work within a reasonable time after such notice, the department may remove, prevent, or rectify any offending condition by barricading or closing the commercial driveway or a portion thereof, or by other methods, and certify the expenses thereof for collection to the Attorney General.

Where, in accordance with Code Section 32-6-132, a change is made in a commercial driveway in existence on July 1, 1973, the department shall be liable for the expenses thereof, provided that the commercial driveway so changed did not, before such change, provide an unsafe and unreasonable access from the abutting property, considering that there exists in the owner of the abutting property a private property right to have a reasonable access from such property to the public road as the same was and would have continued to be according to the mode of its original use. Before making any change or substitution in a commercial driveway in existence on July 1, 1973, when the department has determined that it shall not bear the expenses thereof, the department first shall give written notice to the abutting property owner to begin within 90 days the necessary change in or substitution of the driveway, provided that in the case of a nuisance such notice need be given only ten days in advance. Upon failure of the abutting property owner to complete the necessary change or substitution, the department may perform the necessary work and certify the expenses thereof to the Attorney General for collection.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-945, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

32-6-135.
Effect of part on authority of counties and municipalities to regulate highways, roads, and streets.

Nothing in this part is intended to limit the authority of a county or a municipality to regulate highways, roads, or streets under their exclusive jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-947, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.